Hawaii statutes.
§264-13 Easements, etc., along state
highways. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governor or the
director of transportation as the governor's designee, may dispose of easements
within and access rights along the state highway rights-of-way under such terms
and conditions which, in the director's opinion, are in the best interest of
the public. [L 1966, c 30, §2; HRS §264-13; gen ch 1985; am L 1991, c 36, §1;
gen ch 1992]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next